Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB835.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6144. Early parole for educational and vocational certification.(a) Eligibility.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the board shall reduce by 90 days the period of supervision for an offender on parole if the offender:(1) is in compliance with the terms of release; and(2) during the period of supervision, receives a high school diploma, associate's degree, bachelor's degree, career certificate, vocational certificate, technical certification or high school equivalency diploma.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to an 12345678910111213141516171819 offender on parole who was convicted of a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0835PN0865 - 2 - 1234